lexc/verb/enhuige6.lexc
!!!enhuige.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Verb[gcat] +Rep +Imper  +Pot 
                   +Inf +Inf11 +Inf12 +Inf13 +Inf21 +Inf22 +Inf23 +Pref+ +Adv +Advan
                  +IndefSg1   +IndefSg2   +IndefSg3   +IndefSg12
                  +IndefPl1 +IndefPl2 +IndefPl3
                  +DefSg1   +DefSg2   +DefSg3  
                  +DefPl1 +DefPl2 +DefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg12 +PastDefSg12  +CondDefSg12
                  +ConjIndefSg1   +ConjIndefSg2   +ConjIndefSg3   
                  +ConjIndefPl1 +ConjIndefPl2 +ConjIndefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg1   +ConjDefSg2[lfea]   +ConjDefSg3  
                  +ConjDefPl1 +ConjDefPl2 +ConjDefPl3
                  +PastIndefSg1   +PastIndefSg2   +PastIndefSg3   
                  +PastIndefPl1 +PastIndefPl2 +PastIndefPl3
                  +PastDefSg1   +PastDefSg2   +PastDefSg3  
                  +PastDefPl1 +PastDefPl2 +PastDefPl3
                  +CondIndefSg1   +CondIndefSg2   +CondIndefSg3   
                  +CondIndefPl1 +CondIndefPl2 +CondIndefPl3
                  +CondDefSg1   +CondDefSg2   +CondDefSg3  
                  +CondDefPl1 +CondDefPl2 +CondDefPl3
      
§AA§ §AAA§ §igea§ §igeo§ §igeo2§ §igeu§ §igeuo§
§igejakik1§ §igejatokitek1§ §igeija1§ §igeaa§ §igetattet§
§eo§ §szorelol§ §szorelolmely§ §sj§ §ess§ §igeoe§ §igeoue§
§AAmely§ §AAAmely§ §eomely§ §igeomely§ §igeumely§ §igeuomely§
§igeo2mely§ §igeamely§ §igeija1mely§
§igejatokitek1mely§ §igejakik1mely§ §igeaamely§ §igetattetmely§
§l§ §igeoo§ §igeoomely§

LEXICON Root
Verb;
Prefigekoto;
Verb1;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Verb;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Verb;
+Pref+:széjjel   Verb;
+Pref+:szembe   Verb;
+Pref+:szerte   Verb;
+Pref+:vissza   Verb;
+Pref+:helyre   Verb;
+Pref+:tovább   Verb;
+Pref+:tönkre   Verb;
+Pref+:észre   Verb;
+Pref+:rajta   Verb;
+Pref+:előre   Verb;
+Pref+:félbe   Verb;
+Pref+:félre   Verb;
+Pref+:felül   Verb;
+Pref+:fölül   Verb;
+Pref+:agyon   Verb;
+Pref+:ellen   Verb;
+Pref+:körbe   Verb;
+Pref+:körül   Verb;
+Pref+:közbe   Verb;
+Pref+:közre   Verb;
+Pref+:külön   Verb;
+Pref+:utána   Verb;
+Pref+:végbe   Verb;
+Pref+:végig   Verb;
+Pref+:hátra   Verb;
+Pref+:hozzá   Verb;
+Pref+:egybe   Verb;
+Pref+:ketté   Verb;
+Pref+:össze   Verb;
+Pref+:mellé   Verb;
+Pref+:által   Verb;
+Pref+:alul   Verb;
+Pref+:haza   Verb;
+Pref+:újra   Verb;
+Pref+:abba   Verb;
+Pref+:neki   Verb;
+Pref+:bele   Verb;
+Pref+:újjá   Verb;
+Pref+:benn   Verb;
+Pref+:fenn   Verb;
+Pref+:fönn   Verb;
+Pref+:jóvá   Verb;
+Pref+:szét   Verb;
+Pref+:tele   Verb;
+Pref+:tova   Verb;
+Pref+:meg   Verb;
+Pref+:oda   Verb;
+Pref+:elő   Verb;
+Pref+:túl   Verb;
+Pref+:alá   Verb;
+Pref+:föl   Verb;
+Pref+:ide   Verb;
+Pref+:fel   Verb;
+Pref+:rá   Verb;
+Pref+:ki   Verb;
+Pref+:le   Verb;
+Pref+:el   Verb;
+Pref+:át   Verb;
+Pref+:be   Verb;

LEXICON Verb1
bentlappang AddVerb5;
bentlappang AddVerb;
bentlappang:bentlappanga AddVerb3;
ellentmond AddVerb5;
ellentmond AddVerb;
ellentmond AddVerbmonda;
ellentmond:ellentmonda AddVerb3;
nagyotmond AddVerb5;
nagyotmond AddVerb;
nagyotmond AddVerbmonda;
nagyotmond:nagyotmonda AddVerb3;
odábbküld AddVerb5oe;
odábbküld AddVerbkuzd;
odábbküld:odábbkülde AddVerb3oe;
odébbhord AddVerb5;
odébbhord AddVerbhord;
odébbhord:odébbhorda AddVerb3;
telihord AddVerb5;
telihord AddVerbhord;
telihord:telihorda AddVerb3;
telizsong AddVerb5;
telizsong AddVerb;
telizsong:telizsonga AddVerb3;


!ír
!írhat  potential
!irathat imper potential
!irat imper
!irattattat imper imper
!irjon command
!írhasson
!írogattathat rep imper pot
!íratgathat
!írogattatgat
!Irni
!írnék, írnál .. írnának cond conditional
! írjak írjon írj  command

LEXICON AddVerb
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep;

LEXICON Rep
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^g§AA§t  Imper;
                    Imper1;

LEXICON Imper
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep;
                      Nrep2;

LEXICON Imper1
+Imper:^+cImp^§AA§t  Nrep; !keringet
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep; !keringtet
                      Nrep1;

LEXICON Nrep
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper2;
LEXICON Nrep2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper2;

LEXICON Nrep1
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper1;

LEXICON NImper
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot2;
LEXICON NImper2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot2;
LEXICON NImper1
+Imper:^+cImp^§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot1;

LEXICON Pot
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case;
LEXICON Pot2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case;

LEXICON Pot1
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case1;
LEXICON AddInf
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
                Case;

LEXICON Verb
bolyong AddVerb;
bong AddVerb;
borong AddVerb;
borzong AddVerb;
búsong AddVerb;
csapong AddVerb;
cselleng AddVerb;
cseng AddVerb;
csikland AddVerb;
dereng AddVerb;
dong AddVerb;
eseng AddVerb;
fecskend AddVerb;
feszeng AddVerb;
fetreng AddVerb;
forrong AddVerb;
hajlong AddVerb;
hullong AddVerb;
jajong AddVerb;
kereng AddVerb;
kering AddVerb;
kezd AddVerb;
kong AddVerb;
kárörvend AddVerb;
lappang AddVerb;
leng AddVerb;
lázong AddVerb;
lézeng AddVerb;
mereng AddVerb;
mond AddVerb;
pang AddVerb;
peng AddVerb;
rajong AddVerb;
reng AddVerb;
ráng AddVerb;
setteng AddVerb;
sikong AddVerb;
szorong AddVerb;
szállong AddVerb;
teng AddVerb;
terjeng AddVerb;
tolong AddVerb;
tátong AddVerb;
töpreng AddVerb;
ujjong AddVerb;
verseng AddVerb;
villong AddVerb;
visong AddVerb;
zajong AddVerb;
zeng AddVerb;
zsibong AddVerb;
zsong AddVerb;
állong AddVerb;
öklend AddVerb;
ömleng AddVerb;
örvend AddVerb;
